Utah statutes.
65A-8-209.   Responsibilities of county sheriffs and district fire wardens
in controlling fires.
(1)  In those counties not directly participating in the state wildland fire
protection organization by cooperative agreement as provided in this chapter,
the county sheriff shall take appropriate action to suppress uncontrolled
fires on state or private lands.
(2)  In all cases the sheriff shall:
(a)  report, as prescribed by the state forester, on wildland fire control
action;
(b)  investigate and report fire causes; and
(c)  enforce the provisions of this chapter either independently or in
cooperation with the state forester.
(3)  In those counties participating in the state wildland fire protection
organization by cooperative agreement, the primary responsibility for fire
control is delegated to the district fire warden, who is designated by the
state forester.
(4)  The county sheriff and his organization shall maintain cooperative
support of the fire control organization.
